Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 731. ASSEMBLED VEHICLES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 731.001. DEFINITIONS. (a) In this chapter:

(1) "Assembled motorcycle" means a motorcycle, as defined by Section 541.201, that is built or assembled by a hobbyist.

(2) "Assembled motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, as defined by Section 501.002(17)(A), that:

(A) has a motor, body, and frame; and

(B) is built or assembled by a hobbyist.

(3) "Assembled trailer" means a trailer, semitrailer, or travel trailer, as those terms are defined by Section 501.002, that is built or assembled by a hobbyist.

(4) "Assembled vehicle" means:

(A) an assembled motor vehicle;

(B) an assembled motorcycle;

(C) an assembled trailer;

(D) a custom vehicle;

(E) a street rod;

(F) a replica; or

(G) a glider kit.

(5) "Board" means the board of the department.

(6) "Custom vehicle" and "street rod" have the meanings assigned by Section 504.501.

(7) "Department" means the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(8) "Glider kit" means a truck tractor, as defined by Section 541.201, that is built or assembled using:

(A) a kit that typically consists of a new cab, frame, and front axle and new accessories; and

(B) a used powertrain.

(9) "Hobbyist" means a person who:

(A) builds or assembles an assembled vehicle for personal use;

(B) does not engage in the continuous sale of vehicles, as defined by the department; and

(C) is not the maker of a kit or a manufacturer, as defined by Section 2301.002, Occupations Code.

(10) "Master technician" means a person who holds a master technician certification issued by the National Institute for Automotive Service Excellence.

(11) "Owner" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.001.

(12) "Replica" means a vehicle that uses a manufactured prefabricated body or a body constructed from materials not original to the vehicle and that resembles an established make of a previous year vehicle model. The term may include a custom vehicle or street rod.

(13) "Title" and "vehicle identification number" have the meanings assigned by Section 501.002.

(14) "Vehicle" has the meaning assigned by Section 502.001.

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(4), the term "assembled vehicle" does not include a golf cart, as defined by Section 551.401, or an off-highway vehicle, as defined by Section 551A.001, regardless of whether the vehicle is built or assembled by a hobbyist.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 20.011, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 731.002. RULES. The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 731.003. CONFLICT OF LAW. To the extent of a conflict between this chapter, including a rule adopted under this chapter, and another law, this chapter controls.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. TITLE AND REGISTRATION

Sec. 731.051. ELIGIBILITY FOR TITLE AND REGISTRATION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), an owner of an assembled vehicle shall apply for a title for the vehicle and register the vehicle as provided by Chapters 501 and 502, as applicable, and in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter, regardless of whether the assembled vehicle was built or assembled using a vehicle that was previously titled in this state or another jurisdiction.

(b) An assembled vehicle may not be titled or registered in this state if the vehicle:

(1) is built or assembled from the merging of two or more vehicle classes, provided that component parts from the following vehicle classes may be interchanged:

(A) two-axle, four-tire passenger cars;

(B) two-axle, four-tire pickups, panels, and vans; and

(C) six-tire dually pickups, of which the rear tires are dual tires;

(2) uses the frame or body of a nonrepairable motor vehicle, as defined by Section 501.091;

(3) contains any electrical or mechanical components from a flood-damaged vehicle;

(4) is designed for off-highway use only;

(5) is designed by the manufacturer for on-track racing only;

(6) has been stripped to the extent that the vehicle loses its original identity; or

(7) uses any parts that do not meet federal motor vehicle safety standards, if standards have been developed for those parts.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 731.052. PROCEDURES AND REQUIREMENTS FOR TITLE AND REGISTRATION. (a) The board by rule shall establish procedures and requirements for:

(1) issuance of a title for an assembled vehicle; and

(2) registration of an assembled vehicle.

(b) Rules adopted under Subsection (a):

(1) may not exclude a type of assembled vehicle, other than an assembled vehicle described by Section 731.051(b), from eligibility for title and registration;

(2) must establish the form of a title issued for an assembled vehicle; and

(3) must exempt an assembled vehicle or a type of assembled vehicle from any provision of Chapter 501 or 502 that an assembled vehicle or type of assembled vehicle, by its nature, cannot comply with or otherwise meet the requirements of.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 731.053. CERTIFICATE OF TITLE REQUIREMENTS. (a) The title for an assembled vehicle that has never been titled in this state or any other jurisdiction must:

(1) list the owner of the assembled vehicle as the purchaser;

(2) contain the notation "NONE" in the space for the seller's name;

(3) list the municipality and state in which the vehicle was completed in the space for the seller's municipality and state; and

(4) contain the odometer reading and the notation "NOT ACTUAL MILEAGE".

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (a), a title issued for an assembled vehicle must contain all of the information required under Section 501.021.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 731.054. ASSIGNMENT OF VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER. The department shall assign a vehicle identification number under Section 501.033 to an assembled vehicle unless the vehicle has a discernible vehicle identification number assigned by:

(1) the manufacturer of the component part by which the vehicle may be identified; or

(2) the maker of the kit from which the vehicle is built or assembled.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. INSPECTION BY MASTER TECHNICIAN

Sec. 731.101. INSPECTION REQUIRED FOR ISSUANCE OF TITLE.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) In addition to the inspection required under Chapter 548, an assembled vehicle must pass an inspection conducted by a master technician for the type of assembled vehicle being inspected. The inspection must be conducted before issuance of a title for the assembled vehicle.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) In addition to any inspection required under Chapter 548, an assembled vehicle must pass an inspection conducted by a master technician for the type of assembled vehicle being inspected. The inspection must be conducted before issuance of a title for the assembled vehicle.

(b) On application for title for an assembled vehicle, the owner of the assembled vehicle must provide:

(1) proof acceptable to the department that the vehicle passed an inspection conducted under this section; and

(2) a copy of the master technician's Automobile and Light Truck certification or a successor certification.

(c) The board by rule shall establish procedures and requirements for the inspection required by this section. Rules adopted under this subsection:

(1) must establish inspection criteria;

(2) may specify additional items of equipment that must be inspected by a master technician and may specify different items of equipment that must be inspected based on the type of assembled vehicle; and

(3) must require an owner of an assembled vehicle that is being inspected under this section to pay all fees required for the inspection, including any reinspection, in addition to all applicable fees required under Chapter 548 for an inspection or reinspection conducted under that chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 851 (H.B. 3297), Sec. 25, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 731.102. EQUIPMENT SUBJECT TO INSPECTION. An inspection conducted under Section 731.101 must:

(1) as applicable, include the following items of an assembled vehicle:

(A) frame, chassis, and any structural components of the vehicle;

(B) wheel assembly;

(C) brake system, including each brake and power brake unit;

(D) steering system, including power steering; and

(E) front seat belts in vehicles that contain seat belt anchorages; and

(2) include an evaluation of the structural integrity of the assembled vehicle and, as applicable, the connection points of the:

(A) frame, chassis, or body;

(B) steering system;

(C) drive train; and

(D) suspension.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.